Washington statutes.
RCW 44.73.020

Legislative gift center account.

(1) The legislative gift center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the gift center from the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and other products as approved shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operations and maintenance of the gift center, including the purchase of inventory, and for other purposes as provided in this section. Only the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, or the lead staff person designated by them to oversee management and operation of the gift shop, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and products approved by the legislative gift center, shall be deposited as provided in this subsection:

(a) Twenty-five percent in the legislative oral history account in chapter 44.04 RCW (created in *Substitute House Bill No. 1741);

(b) Twenty-five percent in the oral history, state library, and archives account created in **RCW 43.07.380; and

(c) Fifty percent in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW 27.48.040.

(3) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of items bearing the state seal by the legislative gift center shall be deposited in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW 27.48.040. A full accounting thereof shall be provided to the secretary of state.

(4) The legislative gift center may designate special sales, the proceeds of which shall go to an account specified at the time of designation.

[ 2007 c 453 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Substitute House Bill No. 1741 was not enacted during the 2007 legislative session. However, Third Substitute House Bill No. 1741 was enacted in 2008 and created the legislative oral history account in RCW 44.04.345.

**(2) RCW 43.07.380 was amended by 2008 c 222 s 13, renaming the "oral history, state library, and archives account" to the "Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account."